Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.360

Agent authority—Government program and civil and military service benefits.

(1) In this section, "benefits from governmental programs or civil or military service" means any benefit, program or assistance provided under a statute or regulation including social security, medicare, and medicaid.

(2) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to benefits from governmental programs or civil or military service authorizes the agent to:

(a) Execute vouchers in the name of the principal for allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign government or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described in RCW 11.125.350(1)(a), and for shipment of their household effects;

(b) Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal from a post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place of storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private, and execute and deliver a release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument for that purpose;

(c) Enroll in, apply for, select, reject, change, amend, or discontinue, on the principal's behalf, a benefit or program;

(d) Prepare, file, and maintain a claim of the principal for a benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal may be entitled under a statute or regulation;

(e) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation concerning any benefit or assistance the principal may be entitled to receive under a statute or regulation; and

(f) Receive the financial proceeds of a claim described in (d) of this subsection and conserve, invest, disburse, or use for a lawful purpose anything so received.

[ 2016 c 209 s 213.]